Maryland, session 2026, HB1169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1169*

HOUSE BILL 1169
Article – Transportation
21–801.1.
(a) Unless there is a special danger that requires a lower speed to comply with §
21–801 of this subtitle, the limits specified in this section or otherwise established under
this subtitle are maximum lawful speeds. A person may not drive a vehicle on a highway
at a speed that exceeds these limits.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the maximum speed limits are:
(1) 15 miles per hour in alleys in Baltimore County;
(2) 30 miles per hour on:
(i) All highways in a business district; and
(ii) Undivided highways in a residential district;
(3) 35 miles per hour on divided highways in a residential district;
(4) 50 miles per hour on undivided highways in other locations; and
(5) 55 miles per hour on divided highways in other locations.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a posted maximum speed
limit lawfully in effect on December 31, 1974, is a maximum lawful speed even if it differs
from a limit specified in subsection (b) of this section.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a maximum speed limit
specified in subsection (b) of this section or in effect under subsection (c) of this section may
be altered as provided in this subtitle.
21–803.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) through (6) of this subsection, if,
on the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation, a local authority determines that
any maximum speed limit specified in this subtitle is greater or less than reasonable or
safe under existing conditions on any part of a highway in its jurisdiction, it may establish
a reasonable and safe maximum speed limit for that part of the highway, which may:
(i) Decrease the limit at an intersection;
(ii) Increase the limit in an urban district to not more than 50 miles
per hour;

HOUSE BILL 1169 3
(iii) Decrease the limit in an urban district; or
(iv) Decrease the limit outside an urban district to not less than 25
miles per hour.
(2) An engineering and traffic investigation is not required to conform a
posted maximum speed limit in effect on December 31, 1974, to a different limit specified
in § 21–801.1(b) of this subtitle.
(3) Calvert County may decrease the maximum speed limit to not less than
15 miles per hour on Lore Road and, except for Solomons Island Road, each highway south
of Lore Road without performing an engineering and traffic investigation, regardless of
whether the highway is inside an urban district.
(4) (i) This paragraph applies only to:
1. Anne Arundel County, HOWARD COUNTY, and
Montgomery County; and
2. Municipalities located in Anne Arundel County and
Montgomery County.
(ii) A local authority may decrease the maximum speed limit to not
less than 15 miles per hour on a highway only after performing an engineering and traffic
investigation.
(iii) A local authority may not implement a new speed monitoring
system to enforce speed limits on any portion of a highway for which the speed limit has
been decreased under this paragraph.
(5) Baltimore City may, without performing an engineering and traffic
investigation:
(i) Decrease the maximum speed limit on a highway under its
jurisdiction; or
(ii) Increase to a previously established level the maximum speed
limit on a highway under its jurisdiction.
(6) A municipality located in Queen Anne’s County may decrease the
maximum speed limit to not less than 15 miles per hour on a highway without performing
an engineering and traffic investigation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.